District of Columbia statutes.
25-784

Sale or distribution of beverages by minor prohibited.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a licensee shall not allow any person under 21 years of age to sell, give, furnish, or distribute an alcoholic beverage.

(b)

A licensee may allow an employee who is 18 years of age or older to sell, serve, or deliver an alcoholic beverage on the licensed premises; provided, that no employee under 21 years of age shall serve as a bartender.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 331, ch. 4, §§ 20, 25
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 901, ch. 756, §§ 10, 12
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 104, ch. 159, § 404(g)
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 3(b)
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 12, 29 DCR 3617
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-106, § 2, 31 DCR 3381
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-178, § 2(a), (b), 33 DCR 7654
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, §§ 12, 13, 34 DCR 907
Sept. 11, 1993, D.C. Law 10-12, § 2(c), 40 DCR 4020
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(i), 41 DCR 1658
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
This section is referenced in § 25-781.
1981 Ed., § 25-784.
1973 Ed., § 25-121.